California, session 20252026, AB1233.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 44051 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 44050, to read:44051. A person applying for a noncertificated position at a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school shall provide that prospective employer with a complete list of every school district, county office of education, charter school, private school, and state special school that the applicant has previously been an employee of.SEC. 2. Section 44052 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 44051, to read:44052. (a) On or before July 1, 2027, the California School Information Services shall develop a statewide data system that includes all of the following information for individuals serving in a noncertificated position for a local educational agency or private school employer: agency:(1) The name, date of birth, and a unique identification number of the noncertificated employee. (2) The name of the school employer. (3) The starting date, ending date, if applicable, and title for each school position held by the noncertificated employee. (4) The name of any local educational agency or private school employer that conducted an employee investigation for egregious misconduct that resulted in evidence for a substantiated report, as defined in Section 11165.12 of the Penal Code, on or after July 1, 2027. (5) The date an investigation described in paragraph (4) was commenced. (6) The date a substantiated report described in paragraph (4) was filed. (b) Those local educational agencies and private school organizations that are responsible for employment, employee investigations, or hiring decisions shall, before hiring an individual for a noncertificated position, review the statewide data system established pursuant to subdivision (a) to determine whether an investigation resulted in a substantiated report pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a). (c) Within 30 calendar days of hiring an individual for a noncertificated position the local educational agency employer or private school employer shall provide to the statewide data system established pursuant to subdivision (a) the name and start date of the individual and the title of the noncertificated position. (d) Within 30 calendar days of an individual changing into, or adding, a noncertificated position with the same local educational agency employer or private school organization, employer, the local educational agency employer or private school employer shall provide to the statewide data system established pursuant to subdivision (a) the name and start date of the individual and the title of the new or additional noncertificated position. (e) Within 10 calendar days of a noncertificated employee leaving a position, the local educational agency employer or private school employer shall provide to the statewide data system established pursuant to subdivision (a) the final date of employment or final date in the position. (f) (1) Within 10 calendar days of the start of an investigation of egregious misconduct, the local educational agency employer or private school employer shall submit notice to the statewide data system established pursuant to subdivision (a) that an investigation was commenced. (2) Statewide data system records shall indicate a pending status from the receipt of notice pursuant to paragraph (1) until the local educational agency employer or private school employer submits subsequent notice pursuant to this subdivision. (3) (A) Within 10 calendar days of the completion of an investigation of egregious misconduct, the local educational agency employer or private school employer shall submit notice stating the result of the investigation to the statewide data system. (A)(B) If an investigation of egregious misconduct results in a substantiated report as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 11165.12 of the Penal Code, a record of the investigation result shall be created in the statewide data system. (B)(C) If an investigation of egregious misconduct results in an unfounded report or inconclusive report as defined in Section 11165.12 of the Penal Code, no record of an investigation shall be created in the statewide data system. (4) If a noncertificated employee leaves a local educational agency employer or private school employer before the completion of an investigation of egregious misconduct, the local educational agency employer or private school employer shall submit notice of the change in employment status mid-investigation during the investigation to the statewide data system to be included in the noncertificated employee’s record. (g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply: (1) “Egregious misconduct” has the same meaning as defined in Section 44932. (2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department. SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.